Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-829.11
Rules and regulations.

The agency may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Nonprofit Security Grant Program Act.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 19.
July 19, 2024